New Jersey, session 221, S4399.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.4:24-18 is amended to read as follows: 4:24-18. The governing body of the district shall consist of at least five supervisors, appointed by the State Soil Conservation Committee.  The State Soil Conservation Committee may determine the maximum number of supervisors for each district. The [five] supervisors shall be legal residents of the district. (cf:  P.L.1977, c. 264, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.